Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 1. Vermont Dairy Promotion Council

§ 2971.
Creation of Council.

There is established within the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets the Vermont Dairy Promotion Council, which shall be composed of the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the following: Each milk cooperative with producers subject to the provision of the law with two percent or more of the total producers, shall be entitled to one member of the council plus one additional member for each 15 percent of the total milk subject to the provisions of this section.

The milk cooperatives shall provide the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets with two nominees for each entitlement of whom one shall be appointed by the Secretary. The second nominee shall become an alternate to serve in the absence of the appointee. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall appoint three producer members to the council and one alternate to serve in the absence of any one of these three members to represent those producers not members of a milk cooperative and those cooperatives not eligible under the terms of this section, and one distributor representative, after seeking the advice of producer associations, distributor associations, and individual producers and distributors within the State. During the month of February, six members shall be appointed for a one-year term and the balance for a two-year term. Thereafter one-half of the members shall be appointed annually. The council shall serve at the discretion of the Secretary. A milk producer who is serving on the Vermont dairy promotion council shall not be a member of the Agency disbursing the funds. The appointive members shall each receive $75.00 per day for each day spent in actual attendance at meetings of the council, but not exceeding a total compensation of $750.00 per annum for each member, and they also shall receive their actual necessary expenses and mileage while attending to their duties. The Secretary shall serve as chair of the Council and administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 58; amended

1979, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1981, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 22, 1982;

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

1991, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 7, eff. May 19, 2011.

§ 2972.
Powers and duties.

The Council shall administer and enforce this chapter, and to that end shall plan and conduct dairy commodity advertising, publicity, sales promotion, and research and educational projects to increase the consumption of dairy products and to foster better understanding and more efficient cooperation between producers, dealers, and consumers of dairy products, and may contract for advertising, publicity, sales promotion, research, and educational services, and may employ and discharge advertising counsel, advertising agencies, dairy councils, and other agencies on a statewide, regional, or national basis as it shall deem the best interests of the State of Vermont for these purposes. It may disseminate information relating to dairy products and the importance thereof, either directly or through persons or parties contracted with.

Included among the powers of the Council in connection with the enforcement of this chapter are the powers to require reports from any person subject to this chapter; to adopt, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary rules, regulations, and orders to administer this chapter, which rules, regulations, and orders shall be promulgated by publication in the manner prescribed therefor by the Council and shall have the force and effect of law when not inconsistent with existing laws; to administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, take depositions, and certify to official acts; to require any dealer to keep such true and accurate records and to make such reports covering purchases, sales, and receipts of dairy products and related matters as the Council deems reasonably necessary for effective administration, which records shall be open to inspection by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets at any reasonable time and as often as may be necessary, but information thus obtained shall not be published or be open to public inspection in any manner revealing any individual dealer’s identity, except as required in proceedings to enforce compliance; to keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, and to make annually a full report of its doings to the House and Senate Committees on Agriculture and the Governor, which shall show the amount of money received and the expenditures thereof. The report shall be submitted on or before January 15. The Vermont Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall perform the administrative work of the Council as directed by the Council. The Council shall reimburse the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets for the cost of services performed by the Agency.

The Council is hereby authorized to accept contributions from individuals or organizations to augment its funds.

The Council in allocating the monies it spends for the promotional purposes herein shall consider the sources from which the milk comes, the areas into which the milk goes, and the nature of the population that consumes the milk, so that funds may be allocated proportionately if desired.

The Council shall cooperate with other State agencies in its plans for advertisement and promotion; and in particular with agencies specifically empowered to advertise and promote this State.

The Council is authorized to cooperate with the U.S. government and any Agency thereof charged with similar responsibilities in connection with research, marketing, and pricing in the dairy industry, including federal Milk Market Administrators and their staffs in federally regulated markets and is authorized to cooperate with the appropriate agencies of other states for the purpose of making such investigations, securing and transmitting such information, making available such services and facilities, and exercising such other powers with respect to the administration of this chapter as it deems necessary or appropriate to facilitate its administration in cooperation with the administration of similar acts in other states.

To the extent that in its judgment it may deem advisable to do so in administering this chapter, the Council is authorized to enter into agreements with U.S. government agencies, federal Milk Market Administrators, and state agencies of other states with respect to the collection or audit of tax payments and the use of joint facilities and joint services.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 59; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2007, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 11, 2008.

§ 2973.
Repealed.
1979, No. 101 (Adj. Sess.), § 12; 1981, No. 198 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.